Maryland, session 2026, HB1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1223*

HOUSE BILL 1223
21–330.5.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VENDOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OPERATES:
(1) A MOBILE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 21–304 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) A COTTAGE FOOD BUSINESS.
(B) A COUNTY MAY DESIGNATE AREAS ADJACENT TO A FARMERS MARKET
AS A STREET FOOD VENDING ZONE.
(C) A VENDOR SELLING FOOD, OTHER THAN RAW AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCTS AS DEFINED IN § 21–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN THE STREET FOOD
VENDING ZONE SHALL:
(1) RESIDE WITHIN A GEOGRAPHIC AREA DETERMINED BY THE
RULES OR BYLAWS OF THE FARMERS MARKET;
(2) BE IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE FOOD SERVICE LAWS; AND
(3) MEET THE FARMERS MARKET MEMBERSHIP CRITERIA AND
OPERATING RULES AND REGULATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
(a) There is a Prince George’s County Workgroup on Farmers Markets and Street
Vending Zones.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) the Chair of the Prince George’s County Senate Delegation, or the
Chair’s designee;
(2) the Chair of the Prince George’s County House Delegation, or the
Chair’s designee;
(3) the County Executive of Prince George’s County, or the County
Executive’s designee;
(4) two representatives of the Prince George’s County Council, appointed
by the Chair of the County Council;

HOUSE BILL 1223 3
(5) the following members, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Delegates:
(i) one representative of the vending community;
(ii) one representative of the nonvending community that is affected
by the vending;
(iii) one representative of the Chesapeake Climate Action Network;
and
(iv) one community advocate from the Crossroads Farmers Market;
and
(6) the following members, appointed by the County Executive of Prince
George’s County:
(i) one representative of the Prince George’s County Police
Department;
(ii) one representative of the Prince George’s County Department of
Permitting Inspection and Enforcement;
(iii) one representative of the Prince George’s County Health
Department; and
(iv) one representative of the Prince George’s County Department of
Public Works and Transportation.
(c) The County Executive shall designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Prince George’s County Council shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) identify and review any current regulations or permitting for farmers
markets and street vending;
(2) examine how other counties in the State regulate or permit farmers
markets and street vendors;

HOUSE BILL 1223
(3) identify any safety, health, or environmental concerns related to
farmers markets and street vendors;
(4) identify any community concerns about farmers markets and street
vendors; and
(5) make recommendations on establishing a framework to provide the
regulation and permitting of farmers markets and street vendors.
(g) On or before December 1, 2026, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Chair of the Prince George’s County Senate Delegation and the Chair of the Prince George’s
County House Delegation and the Chair of the Prince George’s County Council and the
County Executive of Prince George’s County.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.